Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4206
Information considered; court orders; refusal to produce document; remedy.

(1) In carrying out his or her powers and duties as a guardian ad litem, the guardian ad litem shall consider any information that is warranted by the nature and circumstances of each guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding.

(2) The guardian ad litem may petition the court for an order to (a) inspect documents, in physical or electronic form, pertaining to the person who is the subject of the guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding that are in the possession of a corporation, financial institution, health care provider, or business entity, or (b) visit any person who may provide relevant information about the person who is the subject of the guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding.

(3) Any person, corporation, financial institution, health care provider, or business entity that refuses to produce any document requested by the guardian ad litem and ordered by the court shall be subject to contempt of court or other discovery sanctions.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 19.